Nevada, session 83, AB71.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 638.008 is hereby amended to read as follows:
638.008 1. “Practice of veterinary medicine” means:
-
*AB71*

– 2 –
(a) To diagnose, treat, correct, change, relieve or prevent animal
disease, deformity, defect, injury or other physical or mental
conditions, including, but not limited to:
(1) The prescription or the administration of any drug,
medicine, biologic, apparatus, application, anesthetic or other
therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique;
(2) The collection of embryos;
(3) Testing for pregnancy or for correcting sterility or
infertility;
(4) Acupuncture;
(5) Dentistry;
(6) Chiropractic procedures;
(7) Surgery, including cosmetic surgery; or
(8) Rendering advice or recommendation with regard to any
of these by any means, including, without limitation, veterinary
telemedicine.
(b) To represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an
ability and willingness to do any act described in paragraph (a).
(c) To use any title, words, abbreviation or letters in a manner or
under circumstances which induce the belief that the person using
them is qualified to do any act described in paragraph (a), except if
the person is a veterinarian.
2. The term does not include:
(a) The practice of a veterinarian or veterinary technician while
he or she lectures, teaches, administers a practical examination or
conducts a laboratory demonstration in a facility in connection with:
(1) A seminar; or
(2) A course of continuing education for veterinarians or
veterinary technicians that has been approved by the Board;
(b) The practice of a person who is a graduate from a school of
veterinary medicine that is not accredited by the Council on
Education of the American Veterinary Medical Association while he
or she is preparing to take a clinical proficiency examination
administered by the American Veterinary Medical Association for
the purpose of acquiring an educational certificate issued by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates of the
American Veterinary Medical Association or its successor
organization as described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS
638.100; [or]
(c) Emergency advice or recommendations given by a poison
control center until the animal can be examined in person by a
licensed veterinarian [.] ; or
-
*AB71*

– 3 –
(d) The subcutaneous implantation of an identification
microchip into an animal.
H
-
*AB71*